Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Chapter 205. Livestock Brands

§ 4011.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for a system of livestock branding in an attempt to reduce the unauthorized sale and movement of livestock.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 4012.
Rules.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2015, No. 23

, § 79.

§ 4013.
Brands; recording.

Any person, firm, or corporation wishing to utilize an artificial mark or brand to distinguish or identify the ownership of any domestic animal or livestock shall apply to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets. The application shall be in writing and shall contain the name, residence, and post office address of the applicant and the species of animals on which the mark or brand is to be used. The Secretary shall designate a brand for the applicant’s use which is different from any other brands recorded in his or her office. The Secretary shall also designate the position on the animals where the mark or brand is to be placed and the species on which the brand is to be used.

The Secretary shall maintain a record of all marks or brands in use, the name of the user, and the date of recording. The records shall be open to public inspection and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein recorded.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1975, No. 24

, § 1;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.

§ 4014.
Right of owner of recorded brand.

The person, firm, or corporation in whose name any mark or brand is recorded is entitled to the exclusive use of the mark or brand on the species of animal and in the position designated in the record.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 4015.
Fees.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall charge and collect the following fees:

Click to view

[Repealed.]

Recording of mark or brand $10.00 Certified copy of a record $ 5.00 Transfer of brand $10.00 Re-recording of brand $ 5.00

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1975, No. 24

, § 2;

1999, No. 49

, § 126;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003.